Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB234.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 16.220 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the duty to return confiscated firearms to innocent owners pursuant to KRS 500.090, all firearms
confiscated by the Department of Kentucky State Police and not retained for official use pursuant to KRS
500.090 shall be sold at public auction to:
(a) Federally licensed firearms dealers holding a license appropriate for the type of firearm sold; or
(b) For a firearm which was used in a homicide, any person who certifies on a form provided by the
Department of Kentucky State Police prior to placing a bid that he or she will, upon completion of the
auction, leave the firearm with the Department of Kentucky State Police for destruction. A state or local
government or agency thereof shall not purchase a firearm under this paragraph.
(2) Any provision of KRS Chapter 45 or 45A relating to disposition of property to the contrary notwithstanding,
the Department of Kentucky State Police shall:
(a) Conduct any auction specified by this section;
(b) Retain for departmental use twenty percent (20%) of the gross proceeds from any auction specified by
this section;
(c) Transfer remaining proceeds of the sale to the account of the Kentucky Office of Homeland Security for
use as provided in subsection (5) of this section; and
(d) For any sale pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section, destroy the firearm.
(3) Prior to the sale of any firearm, the Department of Kentucky State Police shall make an attempt to determine if
the firearm to be sold has been stolen or otherwise unlawfully obtained from an innocent owner and return the
firearm to its lawful innocent owner, unless that person is ineligible to purchase a firearm under federal law.
(4) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall receive firearms and ammunition confiscated by or abandoned
to every law enforcement agency in Kentucky. The department shall dispose of the firearms received in the
manner specified in subsections (1) and (2) of this section. However, firearms which are not retained for
official use, returned to an innocent lawful owner, or transferred to another government agency or public
museum shall be sold as provided in subsection (1) of this section.
(5) The proceeds of firearms sales shall be utilized by the Kentucky Office of Homeland Security to provide
grants to city, county, charter county, unified local government, urban-county government, and consolidated
local government police departments; university safety and security departments organized pursuant to KRS
164.950; school districts that employ special law enforcement officers as defined in KRS 61.900; airport
safety and security departments established under KRS 183.880; and sheriff's departments for the purchase
of:
(a) Body armor for sworn peace officers of those departments and service animals, as defined in KRS
525.010, of those departments;
(b) Firearms or ammunition;
(c) Electronic control devices, electronic control weapons, or electro-muscular disruption technology; and
(d) Body-worn cameras.
In awarding grants under this section, the Kentucky Office of Homeland Security shall give first priority to
providing and replacing body armor and second priority to providing firearms and ammunition, with residual
funds available for the purchase of body-worn cameras, electronic control devices, electronic control weapons,
or electro-muscular disruption technology. Body armor purchased by the department receiving grant funds
shall meet or exceed the standards issued by the National Institute of Justice for body armor. No police or
sheriff's department shall apply for a grant to replace existing body armor unless that body armor has been in
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
actual use for a period of five (5) years or longer. Any department applying for grant funds for body-worn
cameras shall develop a policy for their use and shall submit that policy with its application for the grant funds
to the Office of Homeland Security as part of the application process.
(6) The Department of Kentucky State Police may transfer a machine gun, short-barreled shotgun, short-barreled
rifle, silencer, pistol with a shoulder stock, any other weapon, or destructive device as defined by the National
Firearms Act which is subject to registration under the National Firearms Act and is not properly registered in
the national firearms transfer records for those types of weapons, to the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, and
Firearms of the United States Department of Justice, after a reasonable attempt has been made to transfer the
firearm to an eligible state or local law enforcement agency or to an eligible museum and no eligible recipient
will take the firearm or weapon. National Firearms Act firearms and weapons which are properly registered
and not returned to an innocent lawful owner or retained for official use as provided in this section shall be
sold in accordance with subsection (1) of this section.
Signed by Governor March 7, 2025.